Oklahoma, session 2025, SB85.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 38, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 38. The Department of Corrections shall reimburse any
county which is required to retain an inmate pursuant to subsection
E F of Section 37 of this title in an amount not to exceed Twenty-
seven Dollars ($27.00) Thirty-two Dollars ($32.00) per day for each
inmate during such period of retention, unless the actual daily cost
as determined by the Department of Corrections Daily Rate as defined
in this section, exceeds Twenty-seven Dollars ($27.00) Thirty-two
Dollars ($32.00). If the actual daily cost as determined by the
Department of Corrections Daily Rate county exceeds Twenty-seven
Dollars ($27.00) Thirty-two Dollars ($32.00), the county shall
notify the Department of Corrections of the actual daily cost no
later than September 30. If the county’s actual daily cost is
accepted by the Department that, such amount shall be the
reimbursement rate for the county beginning the next fiscal year.
If the Department rejects the county’s actual daily cost
application, then the actual daily cost reimbursement shall be

determined by the State Auditor and Inspector and shall be imposed
beginning the next fiscal year. The Department shall distribute the
reimbursement on a monthly basis upon receipt and approval of a
billing statement from the county. The county shall use the
reimbursement to defray expenses of equipping and maintaining the
jail and payment of personnel. The provisions in this act shall be
implemented by the Department to allow sufficient time for
application to FY-2019. The Department of Corrections shall
reimburse the county for the emergency medical care for physical
injury or illness of the inmate retained under this act section if
the injury or illness is directly related to the incarceration and
the county is required by law to provide such care for inmates in
the jail. The Department shall not pay fees for medical care in
excess of the rates established for Medicaid providers. The state
shall not be liable for medical charges in excess of the Medicaid
scheduled rate. The Director Department may accept any inmate
required to have extended medical care upon application of the
county.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 85 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 85 Page 3